Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 69 O.S. 2021, Section 504, is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 2082 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of__________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2082 Page 2